Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Article 2. Pen Registers and Trap Devices.

Sec. 12.37.200.
Authorization to use pen registers and trap devices.

Upon application by a peace officer made in conformity with any provision of federal law authorizing such an application, a court may issue an order authorizing or concerning the use of a pen register or a trap device as permitted under federal law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 61 SLA 1993)